Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5532.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 403. (1) An amendment to a zoning ordinance by a city or village is subject to a protest petition. as required by this subsection. If a protest petition is filed, submitted, approval of the amendment to the zoning ordinance shall require requires a 2/3 vote of the legislative body, unless a larger vote, not to exceed a 3/4 vote, is required by ordinance or charter. (2) The protest petition shall must be presented submitted to the legislative body of the city or village before final legislative action on the amendment. and (3) Except as provided in subsection (4), the protest petition shall must be signed by at least 1 or more of the following: (a) The owners of at least 20% of the area of land included in the proposed change. (b) The owners of at least 20% of the area of land included within an area extending outward 100 300 feet from any point on the boundary of the land included in the proposed change. (4) If the amendment to the zoning ordinance increases the authorized number of dwelling units, the protest petition must be signed by at least 1 of the following: (a) The owners of at least 60% of the area of land included in the proposed change. (b) The owners of at least 60% of the area of land included within an area extending outward 300 feet from any point on the boundary of the land included in the proposed change. (5) (2) Publicly owned land shall must be excluded in calculating the 20% land area requirement under subsection (1).area of land under subsections (3) and (4). (6) A protest petition must include, but is not limited to, the following, in the following order: (a) The text or a summary of the ordinance amendment that is the subject of the protest. (b) Information identifying the area of land included in the proposed change. (c) The statement "Warning - A person who signs a petition more than once, signs a name other than the person's own, or indicates ownership of land that the person does not own is guilty of a misdemeanor.". (d) For each signature of a petitioner, the printed name of the signer, the mailing address and, if different, the address, or parcel or lot number, of the land that qualifies each person to sign the petition, and the date of signing. (e) All of the following, in the following order: (i) The heading "Certificate of Circulator". (ii) The statement "The undersigned circulator of the above petition asserts that the circulator is 18 years of age or older and a United States citizen; that each signature on the petition was signed in the circulator's presence; that the circulator has neither caused nor permitted a person to sign the petition more than once and has no knowledge of a person signing the petition more than once; and that, to the circulator's best knowledge and belief, each signature is the genuine signature of the person purported to sign the petition.". (iii) The statement "Circulator - Do not sign or date certificate until after circulating petition.". (iv) The circulator's signature, printed name, mailing address, and signing date. (v) The statement "Warning - A circulator who knowingly makes a false statement in the above certificate, an individual not a circulator who signs as a circulator, or an individual who signs a name other than the individual's own as circulator is guilty of a misdemeanor.". (7) A person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or both: (a) Signs a petition more than once. (b) Signs a petition with a name other than the person's own. (c) Indicates on a petition ownership of land that the person does not own. (d) Makes a false statement in a certificate on a petition. (e) If not a circulator, signs a petition as a circulator. (f) Signs a name as circulator other than the person's own. (8) The city or village clerk shall verify that the petition signers own the land indicated and shall otherwise determine the adequacy of the petition.